Utah statutes.
65A-14-104.   Rulemaking.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 21, 2010 General Session

